District of Columbia statutes.
22-2718

Disposition of proceeds of sale.

The proceeds of the sale of the personal property as provided in § 22-2717, shall be applied in the payment of the costs of the action and abatement and the balance, if any, shall be paid to the defendant.

History

Feb. 7, 1914, 38 Stat. 281, ch. 16, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-2718.
1973 Ed., § 22-2718.